fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-1-mitas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mitâs - ok : # -m animate dependent noun, pair  of pants	AEW C-initial NDA1
     mitâs+N+A+D+PxX+Sg: mitâs
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nitâs
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kitâs
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nitâsinân
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kitâsinaw
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kitâsiwâw
     
     mitâs+N+A+D+PxX+Obv: mitâsa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nitâsa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kitâsa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nitâsinâna
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kitâsinawa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kitâsiwâwa
     
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: otâsa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: otâsiwâwa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otâsiyiwa


     mitâs+N+A+D+PxX+Pl: mitâsak
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nitâsak
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kitâsak
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nitâsinânak
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kitâsinawak
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kitâsiwâwak
     
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: otâsa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: otâsiwâwa
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otâsiyiwa

     mitâs+N+A+D+PxX+Loc: mitâsihk
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nitâsihk
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kitâsihk
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nitâsinâhk
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kitâsinâhk
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kitâsiwâhk

     mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Loc: otâsihk
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Loc: otâsiwâhk
     mitâs+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otâsiyihk

     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Sg:      [micâsis,     micâsisis]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nicâsis,     nicâsisis]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kicâsis,     kicâsisis]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nicâsisinân, nicâsisisinân]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kicâsisinaw, kicâsisisinaw]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kicâsisiwâw, kicâsisisiwâw]

     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [ocâsisa,     ocâsisisa]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [ocâsisiwâwa, ocâsisisiwâwa]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [ocâsisiyiwa, ocâsisisiyiwa]

     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Pl:      [micâsisak,     micâsisisak]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nicâsisak,     nicâsisisak]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kicâsisak,     kicâsisisak]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nicâsisinânak, nicâsisisinânak]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kicâsisinawak, kicâsisisinawak]
     mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kicâsisiwâwak, kicâsisisiwâwak]
